Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 4001.5, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4001.5. A. Account balances and distributions from
savings accounts established pursuant to this act shall be exempt
from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment or any other process
whatsoever and shall be unassignable. In the event of the death of
a beneficiary, the funds from an achieving a better life experience
(ABLE) account are also exempt from Medicaid recovery liens, claims,
and other reimbursement proceedings filed pursuant to Section 12-
994.2 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes by the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority.

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1837 Page 1

B. Money and assets residing in an account established pursuant
to this act or residing in an ABLE account established in another
state shall not be considered for purposes of determining
eligibility for assistance or benefits or for determining the amount
of assistance or benefits to be received from the Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families program or from any other local or
state means-tested public assistance programs.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 26th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate








ENGR. H. B. NO. 1837 Page 2